Louisiana, session 2026, HB392.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Student Suicide
Prevention Awareness Act.
Section 2. R.S. 17:282.4(F) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§282.4. Youth suicide prevention programs; student safety and violence and social
isolation prevention training; policies; intent; rules; services; funding
* * *
F.(1) Each public and approved nonpublic secondary middle school and high
school shall post on its website and may include in its student handbook the
following information:
(a) The National Suicide Prevention Lifeline hotline number, "988", with an
explanation that this number may be called or texted.
(b) A local suicide prevention hotline number, if available, and a state
suicide prevention hotline number, if available.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 392 ENROLLED
(c) A link to Louisiana988.org, a suicide prevention initiative of the
Louisiana Department of Health.
(2) The governing authority of each public and approved nonpublic
secondary middle school and high school that issues student identification cards shall
have printed on the cards the information provided in Subparagraphs (1)(a) and (b)
of this Subsection.
(3)(a) Each middle school and high school that receives federal funds shall
post signage to inform students about the National Suicide Prevention Lifeline
hotline number, "988", with an explanation that this number may be called or texted.
The signage shall include a brief message encouraging students experiencing
emotional distress to seek help as well as an explanation that the hotline is free,
confidential, and available twenty-four hours a day and seven days a week.
(b) The signage shall also include information about Louisiana988.org and
an explanation that additional information and resources, including the ability to chat
online, are available at this website.
(c) The signage shall be placed in locations easily visible to students such as
school entrances and exits, student common areas, school counselor offices, school
nurse offices, near restrooms and locker rooms, and digital school bulletin boards if
available.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.